Yamls/N-kaga_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
# The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-14
  
  Noun - кага: # Nouns in vowels, inanimate noun, full paradigm 'child; baby / lapsi; vauva / ребёнок'
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom: кага
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc: кагаӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen: кагалӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl: кагалісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat: кагалӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins: кагаӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com: кагакӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car: кагатӧг
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns: кагала
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr: кагася
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine: кагаын
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela: кагаись
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill: кагаӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr: кагалань
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr: кагасянь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl: кагаӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI: кагаӧдз
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII: кагави
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne: кагаланьын
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla: кагаланись
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll: кагаланьӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr: кагаланьсянь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl: кагаланьӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI: кагаланьӧдз
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII: кагаланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кагаӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кагаӧлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кагаӧлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кагаӧлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: кагаӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: каганам
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg1: кагаӧкӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [кагаӧтӧг, кагатӧгьям]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: кагаӧла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: кагаӧся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кагаам
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кагасим
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кагаам
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кагаӧлань, кагаланям]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кагаӧсянь, кагасяням]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кагаӧттям, кагаӧттим]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кагаӧдззам, кагаӧдззим]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: кагаӧви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: кагаланям
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: кагаланьсим
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: кагаланям
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кагаланьсяням, кагаӧланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кагаланьӧттям, кагаланьӧттим, кагаӧланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кагаланьӧдззам, кагаланьӧдззим, кагаӧланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: кагаӧланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кагаыт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кагаытлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: кагаытлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: кагаытлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: кагатӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: каганат
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg2: кагаыткӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [кагаыттӧг, кагатӧгьят]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: кагаытла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: кагаытся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: кагаат
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: кагасит
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кагаат
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [кагаытлань, кагаланят]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [кагаытсянь, кагасянят]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [кагаӧттят, кагаӧттит]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [кагаӧдззат, кагаӧдззит]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: кагаытви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: кагаланят
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: кагаланьсит
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: кагаланят
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кагаланьсянят, кагаытланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кагаланьӧттят, кагаланьӧттит, кагаытланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кагаланьӧдззат, кагаланьӧдззит, кагаытланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: кагаытланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кагаыс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кагаыслӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: кагаыслісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кагаыслӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: кагасӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: каганас
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg3: кагаыскӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [кагаыстӧг, кагатӧгьяс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: кагаысла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: кагаысся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: кагаас
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: кагасис
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кагаас
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [кагаыслань, кагаланяс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [кагаыссянь, кагасяняс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [кагаӧттяс, кагаӧттис]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [кагаӧдззас, кагаӧдззис]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: кагаысви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: кагаланяс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: кагаланьсис
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: кагаланяс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кагаланьсяняс, кагаысланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кагаланьӧттяc, кагаланьӧттиc, кагаысланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кагаланьӧдззаc, кагаланьӧдззиc, кагаысланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: кагаысланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: каганым
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: каганымлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: каганымлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: каганымлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: каганымӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: кагананым
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl1: каганымкӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [каганымтӧг, кагатӧгьяным]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: каганымла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: каганымся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: кагааным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: кагасиным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кагааным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [каганымлань, кагаланяным]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [каганымсянь, кагасяняным]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [кагаӧттяным, кагаӧттиным]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [кагаӧдззаным, кагаӧдззиным]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: каганымви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: кагаланяным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: кагаланьсиным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: кагаланяным
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кагаланьсяняным, каганымланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кагаланьӧттяным, кагаланьӧттиным, каганымланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кагаланьӧдззаным, кагаланьӧдззиным,  каганымланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: каганымланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: каганыт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: каганытлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: каганытлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: каганытлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: каганытӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: кагананыт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl2: каганыткӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [каганыттӧг, кагатӧгьяныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: каганытла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: каганытся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: кагааныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: кагасиныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кагааныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [каганытлань, кагаланяныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [каганытсянь, кагасяняныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [кагаӧттяныт, кагаӧттиныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [кагаӧдззаныт, кагаӧдззиныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: каганытви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: кагаланяныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: кагаланьсиныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: кагаланяныт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кагаланьсяняныт, каганытланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кагаланьӧттяныт, кагаланьӧттиныт, каганытланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кагаланьӧдззаныт, кагаланьӧдззиныт, каганытланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: каганытланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: каганыс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: каганыслӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: каганыслісь
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: каганыслӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: каганысӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: кагананыс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl3: каганыскӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [каганыстӧг, кагатӧгьяныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: каганысла
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: каганысся
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кагааныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: кагасиныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кагааныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [каганыслань, кагаланяныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [каганыссянь, кагасяняныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кагаӧттяныс, кагаӧттиныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кагаӧдззаныс, кагаӧдззиныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: каганысви
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: кагаланяныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: кагаланьсиныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: кагаланяныс
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кагаланьсяняныс, каганысланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кагаланьӧттяныс, кагаланьӧттиныс, каганысланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кагаланьӧдззаныс, кагаланьӧдззиныс, каганысланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: каганысланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom: кагаэз
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc: кагаэзӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen: кагаэзлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl: кагаэзлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat: кагаэзлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins: кагаэзӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com: кагаэзкӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car: кагаэзтӧг
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns: кагаэзла
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr: кагаэзся
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine: кагаэзын
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela: кагаэзісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill: кагаэзӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr: кагаэзлань
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr: кагаэзсянь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl: кагаэзӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI: кагаэзӧдз
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII: кагаэзви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne: кагаэзланьын
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla: кагаэзланись
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll: кагаэзланьӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr: кагаэзланьсянь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl: кагаэзланьӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI: кагаэзланьӧдз
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII: кагаэзланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: кагаэзӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: кагаэзӧлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: кагаэзӧлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: кагаэзӧлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: кагаэзӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: кагаэзнам
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg1: кагаэзӧкӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [кагаэзӧтӧг, кагаэзтӧгьям]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: кагаэзӧла
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: кагаэзӧся
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: кагаэзам
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [кагаэзсим, кагаэсим]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: кагаэзам
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [кагаэзӧлань, кагаэзланям]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [кагаэзӧсянь, кагаэзсяням]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [кагаэзӧттям, кагаэзӧттим]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [кагаэзӧдззам, кагаэзӧдззим]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: кагаэзӧви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: кагаэзланям
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: кагаэзланьсим
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: кагаэзланям
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кагаэзланьсяням, кагаэзӧланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кагаэзланьӧттям, кагаэзланьӧттим, кагаэзӧланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кагаэзланьӧдззам, кагаэзланьӧдззим, кагаэзӧланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: кагаэзӧланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [кагаэт, кагаэзыт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [кагаэтлӧн, кагаэзытлӧн]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [кагаэтлісь, кагаэзытлісь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [кагаэтлӧ, кагаэзытлӧ]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [кагаэтӧ, кагаэзтӧ]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: кагаэзнат
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [кагаэткӧт, кагаэзыткӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [кагаэттӧг, кагаэзыттӧг, кагаэзтӧгьят]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [кагаэтла, кагаэзытла]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [кагаэтся, кагаэзытся]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: кагаэзат
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [кагаэзсит, кагаэсит]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кагаэзат
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [кагаэтлань, кагаэзытлань, кагаэзланят]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [кагаэтсянь, кагаэзытсянь, кагаэзсянят]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [кагаэзӧттят, кагаэзӧттит]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [кагаэзӧдззат, кагаэзӧдззит]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [кагаэтви, кагаэзытви]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: кагаэзланят
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: кагаэзланьсит
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: кагаэзланят
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кагаэзланьсянят, кагаэтланьсянь, кагаэзытланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кагаэзланьӧттят, кагаэзланьӧттит, кагаэтланьӧт, кагаэзытланьӧт]
